California statutes. Penal Code
(ii) The sealing of an arrest pursuant to this section does not relieve the petitioner of the obligation to disclose the arrest, if otherwise required by law, in response to any direct question contained in a questionnaire or application for public office, for employment as a peace officer, for licensure by any state or local agency, or for contracting with the California State Lottery Commission.

(iii) The sealing of an arrest pursuant to this section does not affect petitioner’s authorization to own, possess, or have in his or her custody or control any firearm, or his or her susceptibility to conviction under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) of Division 9 of Title 4 of Part 6, if the arrest would otherwise affect this
 authorization or susceptibility.

(iv) The sealing of an arrest pursuant to this section does not affect any prohibition from holding public office that would otherwise apply under law as a result of the arrest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 653, Sec. 1.   (AB 2599)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

851.92.

(a) This section applies when an arrest record is sealed pursuant to Sections 851.87, 851.90, 851.91, 1000.4, and 1001.9.

(b) When the court issues an order to seal an arrest, the sealing shall be accomplished as follows:

(1) The court shall provide copies of the order and a report on the disposition of the arrest, as follows:

(A) Upon issuing the order, the court shall provide a copy to the person whose arrest was sealed and to the prosecuting attorney.

(B) Within 30 days of issuing the order, the court shall
 forward a copy of the order to the law enforcement agency that made the arrest, to any other law enforcement agency that participated in the arrest, and to the law enforcement agency that administers the master local summary criminal history information that contains the arrest record for the sealed arrest.

(C) Within 30 days of issuing the order, the court shall furnish a disposition report to the Department of Justice indicating that relief has been ordered and providing the section of the Penal Code under which that relief was granted and the date that relief was granted.

(D) A sealing order made pursuant to this subdivision shall not be forwarded to the Department of Justice to be included or notated in the department’s manual or electronic fingerprint image or criminal
 history record systems. Any sealing order made pursuant to this subdivision and received by the Department of Justice shall not be processed by the department.

(2) The arrest record shall be updated, as follows:

(A) The local summary criminal history information shall include, directly next to or below the entry or entries regarding the sealed arrest, a note stating “arrest sealed” and providing the date that the court issued the order, and the section pursuant to which the arrest was sealed. This note shall be included in all master copies of the arrest record, digital or otherwise.

(B) The state summary criminal history information shall include, directly next to or below the entry or entries regarding the sealed arrest,
 a note stating “arrest relief granted,” providing the date that the court issued the order and the section of the Penal Code pursuant to which the relief was granted. This note shall be included in all master copies of the arrest record, digital or otherwise.

(3) A police investigative report related to the sealed arrest shall, only as to the person whose arrest was sealed, be stamped “ARREST SEALED: DO NOT RELEASE OUTSIDE THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE SECTOR,” and shall note next to the stamp the date the arrest was sealed and the section pursuant to which the arrest was sealed. The responsible local law enforcement agency shall ensure that this note is included in all master copies, digital or otherwise, of the police investigative report related to the arrest that was sealed.

(4) Court records related to the sealed arrest shall, only as to the person whose arrest was sealed, be stamped “ARREST SEALED: DO NOT RELEASE OUTSIDE OF THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE SECTOR,” and shall note next to the stamp the date of the sealing and the section pursuant to which the arrest was sealed. This stamp and note shall be included on all master court dockets, digital or otherwise, relating to the arrest.

(5) Arrest records, police investigative reports, and court records that are sealed under this section shall not be disclosed to any person or entity except the person whose arrest was sealed or a criminal justice agency. Nothing shall prohibit disclosure of information between criminal history providers.

(6) Notwithstanding the sealing of an arrest, a criminal justice agency
 may continue, in the regular course of its duties, to access, furnish to other criminal justice agencies, and use, including, but not limited to, by discussing in open court and in unsealed court filings, sealed arrests, sealed arrest records, sealed police investigative reports, sealed court records, and information relating to sealed arrests, to the same extent that would have been permitted for a criminal justice agency if the arrest had not been sealed.

(c) Unless specifically authorized by this section, a person or entity, other than a criminal justice agency or the person whose arrest was sealed, who disseminates information relating to a sealed arrest is subject to a civil penalty of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per violation. The civil penalty may be enforced by a city attorney,
 district attorney, or the Attorney General. This subdivision does not limit any existing private right of action. A civil penalty imposed under this section shall be cumulative to civil remedies or penalties imposed under any other law.

(d) As used in this section and Sections 851.87, 851.90, 851.91, 1000.4, and 1001.9, all of the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Arrest record” and “record pertaining to an arrest” mean information about the arrest or detention that is contained in either of the following:

(A) The master, or a copy of the master, local summary criminal history information, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 13300.

(B) The
 master, or a copy of the master, state summary criminal history information as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 11105.

(2) “Court records” means records, files, and materials created, compiled, or maintained by or for the court in relation to court proceedings, and includes, but is not limited to, indexes, registers of actions, court minutes, court orders, court filings, court exhibits, court progress and status reports, court history summaries, copies of state summary criminal history information and local summary criminal history information, and any other criminal history information contained in any of those materials.

(3) “Criminal history provider” means a person or entity that is not a criminal justice agency and that provides background screening
 services or criminal history information on identified individuals to the public or to those outside the criminal justice sector upon request, charge, or pursuant to a contractual agreement or that aggregates into databases that are open to the public or to those outside the criminal justice sector upon request or charge, or pursuant to a contractual agreement, that are not created or maintained by a criminal justice agency, criminal history information on identified individuals. For the purposes of this paragraph, a criminal history provider includes an investigative consumer reporting agency, as defined in Section 1786.2 of the Civil Code, a consumer credit reporting agency, as defined in Section 1785.3 of the Civil Code, and a consumer reporting agency, as defined in Section 603(f) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. 1681a(f)).

(4) “Criminal justice agency” means an agency at any level of government that performs, as its principal function, activities relating to the apprehension, prosecution, defense, adjudication, incarceration, or correction of criminal suspects and criminal offenders. A criminal justice agency includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(A) A court of this state.

(B) A peace officer, as defined in Section 830.1, subdivisions (a) and (e) of Section 830.2, subdivision (a) of Section 830.3, subdivision (a) of Section 830.31, and subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 830.5.

(C) A district attorney.

(D) A prosecuting city attorney.

(E) A city attorney pursuing civil gang injunctions pursuant to Section 186.22a, drug abatement actions pursuant to Section 3479 or 3480 of the Civil Code or Section 11571 of the Health and Safety Code, or a city attorney or county counsel pursuing gun violence restraining orders pursuant to Division 3.2 (commencing with Section 18100) of Title 2 of Part 6.

(F) A probation officer.

(G) A parole officer.

(H) A public defender or an attorney representing a person, or a person representing themselves, in a criminal proceeding, a proceeding to revoke parole, mandatory supervision, or postrelease community supervision, or in
 a proceeding described in Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3.

(I) An expert, investigator, or other specialist contracted by a prosecuting attorney or defense attorney to accomplish the purpose of the prosecution, defense, or representation in the criminal proceeding.

(J) A correctional officer.

(5) “Police investigative report” means intelligence, analytical, and investigative reports and files created, compiled, and maintained by a law enforcement criminal justice agency and relating to a potential crime, violation of the law, arrest, detention, prosecution, or law enforcement investigation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 539, Sec. 1.   (AB 2917)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

851.93.

(a) (1) On a monthly basis, the Department of Justice shall review the records in the statewide criminal justice databases, and based on information in the state summary criminal history repository, shall identify persons with records of arrest that meet the criteria set forth in paragraph (2) and are eligible for arrest record relief.

(2) A person is eligible for relief pursuant to this section, if the arrest occurred on or after January 1, 1973, and meets any of the following conditions:

(A) The arrest was for a misdemeanor offense and the charge was dismissed.

(B) The arrest was for a misdemeanor offense,
 there is no indication that criminal proceedings have been initiated, at least one calendar year has elapsed since the date of the arrest, and no conviction occurred, or the arrestee was acquitted of any charges that arose, from that arrest.

(C) (i) The arrest was for a felony offense not described in clause (ii), there is no indication that criminal proceedings have been initiated, at least three calendar years have elapsed since the date of the arrest, and no conviction occurred, or the arrestee was acquitted of any charges arising, from that arrest.

(ii) If the arrest was for an offense punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for eight years or more or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for eight years or more, there is no indication that criminal proceedings have been initiated, at least six years have elapsed since the
 date of the arrest, and no conviction occurred, or the arrestee was acquitted of any charges arising, from that arrest.

(D) The person successfully completed any of the following, relating to that arrest:

(i) A prefiling diversion program, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 851.87, administered by a prosecuting attorney in lieu of filing an accusatory pleading.

(ii) A drug diversion program administered by a superior court pursuant to Section 1000.5, or a deferred entry of judgment program pursuant to Section 1000 or 1000.8.

(iii) A pretrial diversion program, pursuant to Section 1000.4.

(iv) A diversion program, pursuant to Section 1001.9.

(v) A diversion program described in Chapter 2.8 (commencing with Section 1001.20), Chapter 2.8A (commencing with Section 1001.35), Chapter 2.81 (commencing with Section 1001.40), Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 1001.50), Chapter 2.9A (commencing with Section 1001.60), Chapter 2.9B (commencing with Section 1001.70), Chapter 2.9C (commencing with Section 1001.80), Chapter 2.9D (commencing with Section 1001.81), or Chapter 2.92 (commencing with Section 1001.85), of Title 6.

(b) (1) The department shall grant relief to a person identified pursuant to subdivision (a), without requiring a petition or motion by a party for that relief if the relevant information is present in the department’s electronic records.

(2) The state summary criminal history information shall include, directly next to or below
 the entry or entries regarding the person’s arrest record, a note stating “arrest relief granted,” listing the date that the department granted relief, and this section. This note shall be included in all statewide criminal databases with a record of the arrest.

(3) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (d), an arrest for which arrest relief has been granted is deemed not to have occurred, and a person who has been granted arrest relief is released from any penalties and disabilities resulting from the arrest, and may answer any question relating to that arrest accordingly.

(c) On a monthly basis, the department shall electronically submit a notice to the superior court having jurisdiction over the criminal case, informing the court of all cases for which a complaint was filed in that jurisdiction and for which relief was granted pursuant to this section. Commencing on
 August 1, 2022, for any record retained by the court pursuant to Section 68152 of the Government Code, except as provided in subdivision (d), the court shall not disclose information concerning an arrest that is granted relief pursuant to this section to any person or entity, in any format, except to the person whose arrest was granted relief or a criminal justice agency, as defined in Section 851.92.

(d) Relief granted pursuant to this section is subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) Arrest relief does not relieve a person of the obligation to disclose an arrest in response to a direct question contained in a questionnaire or application for employment as a peace officer, as defined in Section 830.

(2) Relief granted pursuant to this section has no effect on the ability of a criminal justice agency, as
 defined in Section 851.92, to access and use records that are granted relief to the same extent that would have been permitted for a criminal justice agency had relief not been granted.

(3) This section does not limit the ability of a district attorney to prosecute, within the applicable statute of limitations, an offense for which arrest relief has been granted pursuant to this section.

(4) Relief granted pursuant to this section does not affect a person’s authorization to own, possess, or have in the person’s custody or control a firearm, or the person’s susceptibility to conviction under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) of Division 9 of Title 4 of Part 6, if the arrest would otherwise affect this authorization or susceptibility.

(5) Relief granted pursuant to this section does not affect any prohibition
 from holding public office that would otherwise apply under law as a result of the arrest.

(6) Relief granted pursuant to this section does not affect the authority to receive, or take adverse action based on, criminal history information, including the authority to receive certified court records received or evaluated pursuant to Section 1522, 1568.09, 1569.17, or 1596.871 of the Health and Safety Code, or pursuant to any statutory or regulatory provisions that incorporate the criteria of those sections.

(e) This section does not limit petitions, motions, or orders for arrest record relief, as required or authorized by any other law, including, but not limited to, Sections 851.87, 851.90, 851.91, 1000.4, and 1001.9.

(f) The department shall annually publish on the OpenJustice Web portal, as described under Section
 13010, statistics for each county regarding the total number of arrests granted relief pursuant to this section and the percentage of arrests for which the state summary criminal history information does not include a disposition.

(g) This section shall be operative commencing October 1, 2024, subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 47, Sec. 5) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 49, Sec. 2.   (AB 168)   Effective July 2, 2024.   Conditionally operative October 1, 2024, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5A. Uniform Act on Fresh Pursuit [852. - 852.4.]

852.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Act on Fresh Pursuit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 301.)
-------------------------------------------

852.1.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “State” means any State of the United States and the District of Columbia.

(b) “Peace officer” means any peace officer or member of any duly organized State, county, or municipal peace unit or police force of another State.

(c) “Fresh Pursuit” includes close pursuit and hot pursuit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 301.)
-------------------------------------------

852.2.

Any peace officer of another State, who enters this State in fresh pursuit, and continues within this State in fresh pursuit, of a person in order to arrest him on the ground that he has committed a felony in the other State, has the same authority to arrest and hold the person in custody, as peace officers of this State have to arrest and hold a person in custody on the ground that he has committed a felony in this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 301.)
-------------------------------------------

852.3.

If an arrest is made in this State by a peace officer of another State in accordance with the provisions of section 852.2 of this code, he shall without unnecessary delay take the person arrested before a magistrate of the county in which the arrest was made, who shall conduct a hearing for the purpose of determining the lawfulness of the arrest. If the magistrate determines that the arrest was lawful, he shall commit the person arrested to await a reasonable time for the issuance of an extradition warrant by the Governor of this State or admit him to bail for such purpose. If the magistrate determines that the arrest was unlawful he shall discharge the person arrested.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 301.)
-------------------------------------------

852.4.

Section 852.2 of this code shall not be construed so as to make unlawful any arrest in this State which would otherwise be lawful.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 301.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5B. Interstate Jurisdiction [853.1. - 853.4.]



  ARTICLE 1. Colorado River Crime Enforcement Compact [853.1. - 853.2.]

853.1.

(a) Pursuant to the authority vested in this state by Section 112 of Title 4 of the United States Code, the Legislature of the State of California hereby ratifies the Colorado River Crime Enforcement Compact as set forth in Section 853.2.

(b) The purpose of this compact is to promote the interests of justice with regard to crimes committed on the Colorado River by avoiding jurisdictional issues as to whether a criminal act sought to be prosecuted was committed on one side or the other of the exact boundary of the channel, and thus avoiding the risk that an offender may go free on technical grounds because neither state is able to establish that the offense was committed within its boundaries.

(c) This compact shall become operative when ratified by law in the State of Arizona; and shall remain in full force and effect so long as the provisions of this compact, as ratified by the State of Arizona, remain substantively the same as the provisions of this compact, as ratified by this section. This compact may be amended in the same manner as is required for it to be ratified to become operative.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 754, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

853.2.

(a) All courts and officers now or hereafter having and exercising jurisdiction in any county which is now or may hereafter be formed in any part of this state bordering upon the Colorado River, or any lake formed by, or which is a part of, the Colorado River, shall have and exercise jurisdiction in all criminal cases upon those waters concurrently with the courts of and officers of the State of Arizona, so far and to the extent that any of these bodies of water form a common boundary between this state and the State of Arizona. In addition, the officers shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the officers of the State of Arizona on any land mass within 25 air miles of the Colorado River, or within 25 air miles of any lake formed by, or that is a part of, the Colorado River.

(b) This section applies only to those crimes which are established in common between the States of Arizona and California; and an acquittal or conviction and sentence by one state shall bar a prosecution for the same act or omission by the other.

(c) This compact shall not be construed to bar the enforcement of the penal laws of either state not established in common with the other, provided that the act or omission proscribed occurs on that state’s side of the river channel boundary.

(d) This compact does not apply to Division 3.5 (commencing with Section 9840) of the Vehicle Code, relating to registration of vessels, or to Section 658.7 of the Harbors and Navigation Code, relating to the display of a ski flag.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 348, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Note: This section constitutes the primary text of the Colorado River Crime Enforcement Compact.  Section 853.1 provides for ratification, operation, and amendment of the compact.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. California-Nevada Compact for Jurisdiction on Interstate Waters [853.3. - 853.4.]

853.3.

(a) Pursuant to the authority vested in this state by Section 112 of Title 4 of the United States Code, the Legislature of the State of California hereby ratifies the California-Nevada Compact for Jurisdiction on Interstate Waters as set forth in Section 853.4.

(b) The Legislature finds that law enforcement has been impaired in sections of Lake Tahoe and Topaz Lake forming an interstate boundary between California and Nevada because of difficulty in determining precisely where a criminal act was committed.

(c) The Legislature intends that a person arrested for an act that is illegal in both states should not be freed merely because neither state could establish that a crime was committed within its boundaries.

(d) The California-Nevada Compact for Jurisdiction on Interstate Waters is enacted to provide for the enforcement of the laws of this state with regard to certain acts committed on Lake Tahoe or Topaz Lake, on either side of the boundary line between California and Nevada.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 526, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

853.4.

(a) As used in this compact, unless the context otherwise requires, “party state” means a state that has enacted this compact.

(b) If conduct is prohibited by the party states, courts and law enforcement officers in either state who have jurisdiction over criminal offenses committed in a county where Lake Tahoe or Topaz Lake forms a common interstate boundary have concurrent jurisdiction to arrest, prosecute, and try offenders for the prohibited conduct committed anywhere on the body of water forming a boundary between the two states.

(c) This section applies only to those crimes that are established in common between the States of Nevada and California, and an acquittal or conviction and sentence by one state shall bar a prosecution for the same act or omission by the other.

(d) This compact does not authorize any conduct prohibited by a party state.

(e) This compact shall become operative when ratified by law by the party states and shall remain in full force and effect so long as the provisions of this compact, as ratified by the State of Nevada, remain substantively the same as the provisions of this compact, as ratified by this section. This compact may be amended in the same manner as is required for it to become operative.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 526, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.   [Note: This section constitutes the primary text of the California-Nevada Compact for Jurisdiction on Interstate Waters, with subd. (e) providing for its operation and amendment.  Section 853.3 provides for ratification of the compact.])
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5C. Citations for Misdemeanors [853.5. - 853.85.]

853.5.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, in any case in which a person is arrested for an offense declared to be an infraction, the person may be released according to the procedures set forth by this chapter for the release of persons arrested for an offense declared to be a misdemeanor. In all cases, except as specified in Sections 40302, 40303, 40305, and 40305.5 of the Vehicle Code, in which a person is arrested for an infraction, a peace officer shall only require the arrestee to present his or her driver’s license or other satisfactory evidence of his or her identity for examination and to sign a written promise to appear contained in a notice to appear. If the arrestee does not have a driver’s license or other satisfactory evidence of identity in his or her possession, the officer may require the arrestee to place a right thumbprint, or a left thumbprint or fingerprint if the person has a missing or disfigured right thumb, on the notice to appear. Except for law enforcement purposes relating to the identity of the arrestee, no person or entity may sell, give away, allow the distribution of, include in a database, or create a database with, this print. Only if the arrestee refuses to sign a written promise, has no satisfactory identification, or refuses to provide a thumbprint or fingerprint may the arrestee be taken into custody.

(b) A person contesting a charge by claiming under penalty of perjury not to be the person issued the notice to appear may choose to submit a right thumbprint, or a left thumbprint if the person has a missing or disfigured right thumb, to the issuing court through his or her local law enforcement agency for comparison with the one placed on the notice to appear. A local law enforcement agency providing this service may charge the requester no more than the actual costs. The issuing court may refer the thumbprint submitted and the notice to appear to the prosecuting attorney for comparison of the thumbprints. When there is no thumbprint or fingerprint on the notice to appear, or when the comparison of thumbprints is inconclusive, the court shall refer the notice to appear or copy thereof back to the issuing agency for further investigation, unless the court finds that referral is not in the interest of justice.

(c) Upon initiation of the investigation or comparison process by referral of the court, the court shall continue the case and the speedy trial period shall be tolled for 45 days.

(d) Upon receipt of the issuing agency’s or prosecuting attorney’s response, the court may make a finding of factual innocence pursuant to Section 530.6 if the court determines that there is insufficient evidence that the person cited is the person charged and shall immediately notify the Department of Motor Vehicles of its determination. If the Department of Motor Vehicles determines the citation or citations in question formed the basis of a suspension or revocation of the person’s driving privilege, the department shall immediately set aside the action.

(e) If the prosecuting attorney or issuing agency fails to respond to a court referral within 45 days, the court shall make a finding of factual innocence pursuant to Section 530.6, unless the court finds that a finding of factual innocence is not in the interest of justice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 467, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

853.6.

(a) (1) When a person is arrested for an offense declared to be a misdemeanor, including a violation of a city or county ordinance, and does not demand to be taken before a magistrate, that person shall, instead of being taken before a magistrate, be released according to the procedures set forth by this chapter, although nothing prevents an officer from first booking an arrestee pursuant to subdivision (g). If the person is released, the officer or the officer’s superior shall prepare in duplicate a written notice to appear in court, containing the name and address of the person, the offense charged, and the time when, and place where, the person shall appear in court. If, pursuant to subdivision (i), the person is not
 released prior to being booked and the officer in charge of the booking or the officer’s superior determines that the person should be released, the officer or the officer’s superior shall prepare a written notice to appear in a court.

(2) When a person is arrested for a misdemeanor violation of a protective court order involving domestic violence, as defined in Section 13700, or arrested pursuant to a policy, as described in Section 13701, the person shall be taken before a magistrate instead of being released according to the procedures set forth in this chapter, unless the arresting officer determines that there is not a reasonable likelihood that the offense will continue or resume or that the safety of persons or property would be imminently endangered by release of the person arrested. Prior to adopting these provisions, each city,
 county, or city and county shall develop a protocol to assist officers to determine when arrest and release is appropriate, rather than taking the arrested person before a magistrate. The county shall establish a committee to develop the protocol, consisting of, at a minimum, the police chief or county sheriff within the jurisdiction, the district attorney, county counsel, city attorney, representatives from domestic violence shelters, domestic violence councils, and other relevant community agencies.

(3) This subdivision does not apply to the crimes specified in Section 1270.1, including crimes defined in each of the following:

(A) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 243.

(B) Section 273.5.

(C) Section 273.6, if the detained person made threats to kill or harm, has engaged in violence against, or has gone to the residence or workplace of, the protected party.

(D) Section 646.9.

(4) This subdivision shall not affect a defendant’s ability to be released on bail or on their own recognizance, except as specified in Section 1270.1.

(b) Unless waived by the person, the time specified in the notice to appear shall be at least 10 days after arrest if the duplicate notice is to be filed by the officer with the magistrate.

(c) The place specified in the notice shall be the court of the magistrate
 before whom the person would be taken if the requirement of taking an arrested person before a magistrate were complied with, or shall be an officer authorized by that court to receive a deposit of bail.

(d) The officer shall deliver one copy of the notice to appear to the arrested person, and the arrested person, in order to secure
 release, shall give their written promise to appear in court as specified in the notice by signing the duplicate notice, which shall be retained by the officer, and the officer may require the arrested person, if the arrested person has no satisfactory identification, to place a right thumbprint, or a left thumbprint or fingerprint if the person has a missing or disfigured right thumb, on the notice to appear. Except for law enforcement purposes relating to the identity of the arrestee, a person or entity shall not sell, give away, allow the distribution of, include in a database, or create a database with, this print. Upon the signing of the duplicate notice, the arresting officer shall immediately release the person arrested from custody.

(e) The officer shall, as soon as practicable, file the duplicate notice, as follows:

(1) It shall be filed with the magistrate if the offense charged is an infraction.

(2) It shall be filed with the magistrate if the prosecuting attorney has previously directed the officer to do so.

(3) (A) The duplicate notice and underlying police reports in support of the charge or charges shall be filed with the prosecuting attorney in cases other than those specified in paragraphs (1) and (2).

(B) If the duplicate notice is filed with the prosecuting attorney, the prosecuting attorney, within their discretion, may initiate prosecution by filing the notice or a formal complaint with the magistrate specified in the duplicate notice within
 25 days from the time of arrest. If the prosecution is not to be initiated, the prosecutor shall send notice to the person arrested at the address on the notice to appear. The failure by the prosecutor to file the
 notice or formal complaint within 25 days of the time of the arrest shall not bar further prosecution of the misdemeanor charged in the notice to appear. However, any further prosecution shall be preceded by a new and separate citation or an arrest warrant.

(C) Upon the filing of the notice with the magistrate by the officer, or the filing of the notice or formal complaint by the prosecutor, the magistrate may fix the amount of bail that in the magistrate’s judgment, in accordance with Section 1275, is reasonable and sufficient for the appearance of the defendant and shall endorse upon the notice a statement signed by the magistrate in the form set forth in Section 815a. The defendant may, prior to the date upon which the defendant promised to appear in court, deposit with the magistrate the amount of bail set by the magistrate. At
 the time the case is called for arraignment before the magistrate, if the defendant does not appear, either in person or by counsel, the magistrate may declare the bail forfeited, and may, in the magistrate’s discretion, order that further proceedings shall not be had in the case, unless the defendant has been charged with a violation of Section 374.3 or 374.7 of this code or of Section 11357, 11360, or 13002 of the Health and Safety Code, or a violation punishable under Section 5008.7 of the Public Resources Code, and the defendant has previously been convicted of a violation of that section or a violation that is punishable under that section, except when the magistrate finds that undue hardship will be imposed upon the defendant by requiring the defendant to appear, the magistrate may declare the bail forfeited and order that further proceedings not be had in the case.

(D) Upon the making of the order that further proceedings not be had, all sums deposited as bail shall immediately be paid into the county treasury for distribution pursuant to Section 1463.

(f) A warrant shall not be issued for the arrest of a person who has given a written promise to appear in court, unless and until the person has violated that promise or has failed to deposit bail, to appear for arraignment, trial, or judgment, or to comply with the terms and provisions of the judgment, as required by law.

(g) The officer may book the arrested person at the scene or at the arresting agency prior to release or indicate on the citation that the arrested person shall appear at the arresting agency to be booked or indicate on the
 citation that the arrested person shall appear at the arresting agency to be fingerprinted prior to the date the arrested person appears in court. If it is indicated on the citation that the arrested person shall be booked or fingerprinted prior to the date of the person’s court appearance, the arresting agency, at the time of booking or fingerprinting, shall provide the arrested person with verification of the booking or fingerprinting by making an entry on the citation. If it is indicated on the citation that the arrested person is to be booked or fingerprinted, the magistrate, judge, or court shall, before the proceedings begin, order the defendant to provide verification that the defendant was booked or fingerprinted by the arresting agency. If the defendant cannot produce the verification, the magistrate, judge, or court shall require that the defendant be booked or fingerprinted by the arresting
 agency before the next court appearance, and that the defendant provide the verification at the next court appearance unless both parties stipulate that booking or fingerprinting is not necessary.

(h) A peace officer shall use the written notice to appear procedure set forth in this section for any misdemeanor offense in which the officer has arrested a person without a warrant pursuant to Section 836 or in which the officer has taken custody of a person pursuant to Section 847.

(i) When a person is arrested by a peace officer for a misdemeanor, that person shall be released according to the procedures set forth in this chapter unless one of the following is a reason for nonrelease, in which case the arresting officer may release the person, except as provided in subdivision
 (a), or the arresting officer shall indicate, on a form to be established by the officer’s employing law enforcement agency, which of the following was a reason for the nonrelease:

(1) The person arrested was so intoxicated that they could have been a danger to themselves or to others.

(2) The person arrested required medical examination or medical care or was otherwise unable to care for their own safety.

(3) The person was arrested under one or more of the circumstances listed in Sections 40302 and 40303 of the Vehicle Code.

(4) There were one or more outstanding arrest warrants for the person.

(5) The person could not provide satisfactory evidence of personal identification.

(6) The prosecution of the offense or offenses for which the person was arrested, or the prosecution of any other offense or offenses, would be jeopardized by immediate release of the person arrested.

(7) There was a reasonable likelihood that the offense or offenses would continue or resume, or that the safety of persons or property would be imminently endangered by release of the person arrested.

(8) The person arrested demanded to be taken before a magistrate or refused to sign the notice to appear.

(9) There is reason to believe that the person would not appear at
 the time and place specified in the notice. The basis for this determination shall be specifically stated.

(10) (A) The person was subject to Section 1270.1.

(B) The form shall be filed with the arresting agency as soon as practicable and shall be made available to any party having custody of the arrested person, subsequent to the arresting officer, and to any person authorized by law to release the arrested person from custody before trial.

(11) The person has been cited, arrested, or convicted for
 misdemeanor or felony theft from a store in the previous six months.

(12) There is probable cause to believe that the person arrested is guilty of committing organized retail theft, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 490.4.
